Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 3 Letters of Administration

53-6-20.
Selection or appointment of administrator.

An administrator may be unanimously selected by all the heirs of a deceased intestate unless the sole heir is the decedent’s surviving spouse and an action for divorce or separate maintenance was pending between the deceased intestate and the surviving spouse at the time of death. With respect to any heir who is not sui juris, consent may be given by the guardian of the individual. When no such unanimous selection is made, the probate court shall make the appointment that will best serve the interests of the estate, considering the following order of preferences:

The surviving spouse, unless an action for divorce or separate maintenance was pending between the deceased intestate and the surviving spouse at the time of death;

One or more other heirs of the intestate or the person selected by the majority in interest of them;

Any other eligible person;

Any creditor of the estate; or

The county administrator.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 22.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

53-6-21.
Petition to court; contents.

Every petition for letters of administration shall be made to the probate court of the county of domicile of the decedent, or, if the decedent was not domiciled in this state, then in a county where the estate or some portion of it is located.

The petition shall set forth the full name, the legal domicile, and the date of death of the decedent; the mailing address and place of domicile of the petitioner; the names, ages or majority status, and addresses of heirs, stating their relationship to the decedent; and, in the event full particulars are lacking, the reasons for any omission. The petition shall conclude with a prayer for issuance of letters of administration. If a prior personal representative has qualified and a copy of the original petition is attached, it is unnecessary for the new petition to repeat relevant and unchanged information from the original petition.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 13.

Cross references.

Provisions regarding jurisdiction of probate court over estate of nonresident with property or causes of action located in more than one county, §

15-9-32

.

Law reviews.

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-6-22.
Notice.

Notice of the petition for letters of administration shall be served by the court by first-class mail on each heir with a known address at least 30 days prior to the date on or before which any objection is required to be filed. If there is any heir whose current address is unknown or any heir who is unknown, notice shall be served on any such heir by being published in the official newspaper of the county in which the petition is made once each week for four weeks prior to the week that includes the date on or before which any objection must be filed.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 14; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-31/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in this Code section, in the first sentence, substituted “served by the court by first-class mail on” for “mailed by first-class mail to”, and substituted “30 days” for “13 days”, and, in the second sentence, substituted “served on any such heir by being published in the official newspaper of the county in which the petition is made”’ for “published” and substituted “that includes” for “which includes”.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-6-23.
Issuance.

Letters of administration may issue to any person selected as provided by Code Section 53-6-20, and a new citation need not be published if the administrator is someone other than the person named in the citation.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-6-24.
Oath or affirmation of administrator.

Every administrator, upon qualification (which qualification may be done at any time if appointed at a regular term), shall take and subscribe an oath or affirmation in substantially the following form:

Click to view

The oath or affirmation of an administrator as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section may be subscribed before the judge or clerk of any probate court of this state. The probate court appointing the administrator shall have the authority to grant a commission to a judge or clerk of any court of record of any state to administer the oath or affirmation.

“I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that
, deceased, died intestate so far as I know or believe, and that I will well and truly administer the estate in accordance with the laws of Georgia. So help me God.”

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.